Washington statutes.
RCW 18.43.030

Board of registration—Members—Terms—Qualifications—Compensation and travel expenses.

A state board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors is hereby created which shall exercise all of the powers and perform all of the duties conferred upon it by this chapter. After July 9, 1986, the board shall consist of seven members, who shall be appointed by the governor and shall have the qualifications as hereinafter required. The terms of board members in office on June 11, 1986, shall not be affected. The first additional member shall be appointed for a four-year term and the second additional member shall be appointed for a three-year term. On the expiration of the term of any member, the governor shall appoint a successor for a term of five years to take the place of the member whose term on said board is about to expire. However, no member shall serve more than two consecutive terms on the board. Each member shall hold office until the expiration of the term for which such member is appointed or until a successor shall have been duly appointed and shall have qualified.

Five members of the board shall be registered professional engineers licensed under the provisions of this chapter. Two members shall be registered professional land surveyors licensed under this chapter. Each of the members of the board shall have been actively engaged in the practice of engineering or land surveying for at least ten years subsequent to registration, five of which shall have been immediately prior to their appointment to the board.

Each member of the board shall be a citizen of the United States and shall have been a resident of this state for at least five years immediately preceding his or her appointment.

Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and, in addition thereto, shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

The governor may remove any member of the board for misconduct, incompetency, or neglect of duty. Vacancies in the membership of the board shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the governor as hereinabove provided.

[ 2011 c 336 s 481; 1986 c 102 s 1; 1984 c 287 s 35; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 37; 1947 c 283 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8306-23.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.